Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6119
Experts; costs.

For the purpose of determining whether a plan of conversion meets the requirements of the Insurers Demutualization Act or in connection with any other matters relating to development of a plan of conversion, the director may engage the services of experts. All reasonable costs related to the review of a plan of conversion or such other matters, including those costs attributable to the use of experts, shall be paid by the mutual insurer making the filing or initiating discussions with the director about such matters.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 59;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 15.